Utah statutes.
31A-22-422.   Conditional coverage.

Conditional or binding receipts or other documents issued by a life insurer, whatever they are named, which conditionally grant life insurance coverage prior to physical delivery of the policy are subject to the form filing requirements under Section 31A-21-201.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

